District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-225.01

Right of Mayor to contract.

Repealed.

History

June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 103, ch. 180, § 3
Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1103(b), 32 DCR 7396

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1101.
1973 Ed., § 1-801.